pt-BR: Tela para tapeçaria contagem da malha: Malha nº 10; Malha nº 12; Malha nº 13; Malha nº 14; Malha nº 16; Malha nº 18; Malha nº 20; Malha nº 22; Outro
vi: Số mắt lưới trên vải thêu kim: Lưới #10; Lưới #12; Lưới #13; Lưới #14; Lưới #16; Lưới #18; Lưới #20; Lưới #22; Khác
zh-CN: 绒绣帆布网眼数: 10 网目; 12 网目; 13 网目; 14 网目; 16 网目; 18 网目; 20 网目; 22 网目; 其他
lt-LT: Gobeleno drobės akių tankis: #10 tinklas; #12 tinklas; #13 tinklas; #14 tinklas; #16 tinklas; #18 tinklas; #20 tinklas; #22 tinklas; Kita
hr-HR: Broj mreža platna za vezenje: Mreža br. 10; Mreža br. 12; Mreža br. 13; Mreža br. 14; Mreža br. 16; Mreža br. 18; Mreža br. 20; Mreža br. 22; Ostalo
sv: Maskantal för nålsticksduk: Mesh 10; Mesh 12; Mesh 13; Mesh 14; Mesh 16; Mesh 18; Mesh 20; Mesh 22; Övrigt
fr: Nombre de fils par pouce de la toile à tapisserie: Maille nº 10; Maille nº 12; Maille nº 13; Maille nº 14; Maille nº 16; Maille nº 18; Maille nº 20; Maille nº 22; Autre
sl-SI: Gostota mrežice kanvasa za gobelin: Mreža št. 10; Mreža št. 12; Mreža št. 13; Mreža št. 14; Mreža št. 16; Mreža št. 18; Mreža št. 20; Mreža št. 22; Drugo
bg-BG: Гъстота на платното за гоблен: Канава №10; Канава №12; Канава №13; Канава №14; Канава №16; Канава №18; Канава №20; Канава №22; Друго
nb: Nettingtall for nålepunktlerret: Nr. 10 mesh; Nr. 12 mesh; Nr. 13 mesh; Nr. 14 mesh; Nr. 16 mesh; Nr. 18 mesh; Nr. 20 mesh; Nr. 22 mesh; Annet
cs: Počet vláken plátna na vyšívání: #10 mesh; #12 mesh; #13 mesh; #14 mesh; #16 mesh; #18 mesh; #20 mesh; #22 mesh; Ostatní
nl: Stramien maaswijdte: #10 mesh; #12 mesh; #13 mesh; #14 mesh; #16 mesh; #18 mesh; #20 mesh; #22 mesh; Anders
de: Maschenzahl der Needlepoint-Leinwand: #10 Mesh; #12 Mesh; #13 Mesh; #14 Mesh; #16 Mesh; #18 Mesh; #20 Mesh; #22 Mesh; Sonstiges
ko: 니들포인트 캔버스 메시 수: 10 메시; 12 메시; 13 메시; 14 메시; 16 메시; 18 메시; 20 메시; 22 메시; 기타
tr: Goblen kanvas örgü sayısı: #10 gözenek; #12 gözenek; #13 gözenek; #14 gözenek; #16 gözenek; #18 gözenek; #20 gözenek; #22 gözenek; Diğer
pt-PT: contagem de malha da tela de bordado: Malha n.º 10; Malha n.º 12; Malha n.º 13; Malha n.º 14; Malha n.º 16; Malha n.º 18; Malha n.º 20; Malha n.º 22; Outro
zh-TW: 針繡畫布網目數: 10 網目; 12 網目; 13 網目; 14 網目; 16 網目; 18 網目; 20 網目; 22 網目; 其他
sk-SK: Počet očiek na plátne pre vyšívanie: Sieťovina č. 10; Sieťovina č. 12; Sieťovina č. 13; Sieťovina č. 14; Sieťovina č. 16; Sieťovina č. 18; Sieťovina č. 20; Sieťovina č. 22; Iné
en: Needlepoint canvas mesh count: #10 mesh; #12 mesh; #13 mesh; #14 mesh; #16 mesh; #18 mesh; #20 mesh; #22 mesh; Other
ro-RO: Numărul de ochiuri pe inch al pânzei pentru goblen: Canava nr. 10; Canava nr. 12; Canava nr. 13; Canava nr. 14; Canava nr. 16; Canava nr. 18; Canava nr. 20; Canava nr. 22; Altele
da: Mesh count for stramaj: #10 net; #12 net; #13 net; #14 net; #16 net; #18 net; #20 net; #22 net; Andet
pl: Gęstość siatki kanwy needlepoint: Splot #10; Splot #12; Splot #13; Splot #14; Splot #16; Splot #18; Splot #20; Splot #22; Inne
fi: Kirjontakankaan silmätiheys: #10; #12; #13; #14; #16; #18; #20; #22; Muu
ja: ニードルポイントキャンバスのメッシュ数: #10 メッシュ; #12 メッシュ; #13 メッシュ; #14 メッシュ; #16 メッシュ; #18 メッシュ; #20 メッシュ; #22 メッシュ; その他
el: Πυκνότητα πλέγματος σε καμβά κεντήματος: Πλέγμα #10; Πλέγμα #12; Πλέγμα #13; Πλέγμα #14; Πλέγμα #16; Πλέγμα #18; Πλέγμα #20; Πλέγμα #22; Άλλο
ru: Плотность канвы для гобеленовой вышивки: Канва № 10; Канва № 12; Канва № 13; Канва № 14; Канва № 16; Канва № 18; Канва № 20; Канва № 22; Другая
hu: Gobelinvászon hálósűrűsége: 10-es sűrűségű háló; 12-es sűrűségű háló; 13-as sűrűségű háló; 14-es sűrűségű háló; 16-os sűrűségű háló; 18-as sűrűségű háló; 20-as sűrűségű háló; 22-es sűrűségű háló; Egyéb
es: Número de malla del lienzo para bordado: Malla n.º 10; Malla n.º 12; Malla n.º 13; Malla n.º 14; Malla n.º 16; Malla n.º 18; Malla n.º 20; Malla n.º 22; Otro
th: จำนวนตาข่ายของผ้าปักเข็ม: ตาข่ายเบอร์10; ตาข่ายเบอร์12; ตาข่ายเบอร์13; ตาข่ายเบอร์14; ตาข่ายเบอร์16; ตาข่ายเบอร์18; ตาข่ายเบอร์20; ตาข่ายเบอร์22; อื่นๆ
it: Numero di trame della tela per mezzo punto: Tela #10; Tela #12; Tela #13; Tela #14; Tela #16; Tela #18; Tela #20; Tela #22; Altro